Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-382
Law concerning confidentiality; applicability.

(1) No rule of evidence or other provision of law concerning confidential communications shall apply to prevent reports made pursuant to the Adult Protective Services Act unless otherwise specifically mentioned in the act.

(2) Evidence shall not be excluded from any judicial proceeding resulting from a report made pursuant to the Adult Protective Services Act on the ground that it is a confidential communication protected by the privilege granted to husband and wife, patient and physician, or client and professional counselor.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 35;

Laws 1993, LB 130, § 2.